Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 6. Benefits.
Sec. 23.20.387.
Disqualification for misrepresentation.

An insured worker is disqualified for benefits for the week with respect to which the false statement or misrepresentation was made and for an additional period of not less than six weeks or more than 52 weeks if the department determines that the insured worker has knowingly made a false statement or misrepresentation of a material fact or knowingly failed to report a material fact with intent to obtain or increase benefits under this chapter. The length of the additional disqualification and the beginning date of that disqualification shall be determined by the department according to the circumstances in each case.

A person may not be disqualified from receiving benefits under this section unless there is documented evidence that the person has made a false statement or a misrepresentation as to a material fact or has failed to disclose a material fact. Before a determination of fraudulent misrepresentation or nondisclosure may be made, there must be a preponderance of evidence of an intention to defraud, and the false statement or misrepresentation must be shown to be knowing and to involve a material fact.

The insured worker shall be notified of the department’s determination under this section as provided in AS

23.20.340(f)

and may appeal the determination as provided in AS

23.20.415

.

History.

(§ 61 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 24 ch 100 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.390.
Recovery of improper payments; penalty.

An individual who receives a sum as benefits from the unemployment compensation fund when not entitled to it under this chapter is liable to the fund for the sum improperly paid to the individual.

The department shall promptly prepare and deliver or mail to the individual at the individual’s last address of record a notice of determination of liability declaring that the individual has been determined liable to refund the amount of benefits to which the individual is not entitled. The amount, if not previously collected, shall be deducted from future benefits payable to the individual. However, the department may absolve liability to the fund for repayment of all or a portion of those benefits if the department determines that an individual has died or has acted in good faith in claiming and receiving benefits to which the individual was not entitled and recovery of those benefits would be against equity and good conscience.

For similar cause and in the same manner, a claim by another state for the recovery of sums paid as benefits under an employment security law of the other state is recoverable under this chapter if the sums were obtained by an individual who is not entitled and the other state has a comparable provision in its employment security law for recovery of the sums on behalf of this state.

If paid-out benefit sums have neither been repaid by the recipient nor deducted from benefits payable to the recipient within two years following the last day of the year in which payment was made, the commissioner may declare the sums uncollectible and cancel both the resulting shortage and related records.

An appeal from the determination of liability under this section may be made in the same manner and to the same extent as provided by AS

23.20.340

and

23.20.410

—

23.20.470

for an appeal relating to a determination in respect to a claim for benefits. If no appeal is taken to the appeal tribunal by the individual within 30 days of the delivery of the notice of determination of liability, or within 30 days of the mailing of the notice of determination, whichever is earlier, the determination of liability is final and the court shall, upon application of the department, enter a judgment in the amount provided by the notice of determination. The judgment has the same effect as a judgment entered in a civil action.

In addition to the liability under (a) of this section for the amount of benefits improperly paid, an individual who is disqualified from receipt of benefits under AS

23.20.387

is liable to the department for a penalty in an amount equal to 50 percent of the benefits that were obtained by knowingly making a false statement or misrepresenting a material fact, or knowingly failing to report a material fact, with the intent to obtain or increase benefits under this chapter. The department shall deposit into the unemployment trust fund account (AS

23.20.135(a)

) a minimum of 30 percent of the penalties collected because of benefits that were obtained by knowingly making a false statement or misrepresenting a material fact, or knowingly failing to report a material fact, with the intent to obtain or increase benefits under this chapter.

History.

(§ 751 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1965; am § 62 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 114 SLA 1981; am § 16 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 25 ch 100 SLA 1989; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 43 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 130 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 50 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e) and relettered in 1965, at which time former subsection (d) was relettered as (e).

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective June 30, 2004, substituted “obtained by an individual who is not entitled” for “fraudulently obtained” in subsection (c).

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, deleted the second sentence, which read “The department may, under regulations adopted under this chapter, waive the collection of a penalty under this section.”; at the end of the present second sentence substituted “the unemployment trust fund account” to the end for “the general fund the penalty that it collects”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 130, SLA 2004 (HB 490), which recommends changes to ensure that this chapter complies with federal law requirements and amends (c) of this section, see 2004 House Journal 2613 — 2614.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 50, SLA 2013 (HB 76), see 2013 House Journal 70 — 71.

Sec. 23.20.392.
Deductions from back pay awards.

An employer who makes a deduction from a back pay award to an insured worker because of the insured worker’s receipt of benefits under this chapter for which the insured worker is ineligible by reason of the back pay award, shall pay into the unemployment trust fund an amount equal to the amount of the deduction.
If an employer making a payment under this section has already reimbursed the department for the benefits under AS

23.20.276

and

23.20.277

, the account of the employer shall be properly credited.
The insured worker’s liability under AS

23.20.390

shall be reduced by the amount paid by the employer under this section.

History.

(§ 17 ch 115 SLA 1982)

Sec. 23.20.395.
Waiver of rights void.

An agreement by an individual to waive, release, or commute the individual’s right to benefits or any other rights under this chapter is void.

An agreement by an individual in the employ of a person or concern to pay all or a portion of an employer’s contributions required under this chapter from the employer is void.

An employer may not make or require or accept a deduction from wages to finance the employer’s contributions required from the employer, or require or accept a waiver of any right under this chapter by an employee. An employer or officer or agent of an employer who violates a provision of this section upon conviction is punishable, for each offense, by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 761 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.400.
Limitation of fees.

An individual claiming benefits may not be charged a fee of any kind in a proceeding under this chapter by the department or its representatives, or by a court or an officer of a court. An individual claiming benefits in a proceeding before the department or its representatives or a court may be represented by counsel or other authorized agent; but the counsel or agent may not charge or receive for services more than an amount approved by the department or the court.

A person who violates a provision of this section upon conviction is punishable, for each offense, by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 762 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.401.
Child support interception.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation must disclose whether child support obligations as defined in (h) of this section are owed by that individual. If the individual discloses that child support obligations are owed and the individual is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation, the department shall notify the child support services agency of the Department of Revenue that the individual has been determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

The department shall, unless the obligor and obligee agree otherwise, deduct and withhold from unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes child support obligations as defined in (h) of this section

the amount specified by the individual to the department to be deducted and withheld under this subsection, if neither (2) nor (3) of this subsection is applicable;

the amount specified in an agreement submitted to the department under 42 U.S.C. 654(19)(B)(i) (sec. 454(19)(B)(i), Social Security Act), by the child support services agency of the Department of Revenue, unless (3) of this subsection is applicable; or

any amount required to be deducted and withheld through legal process, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 662(e) (Sec. 462(e), Social Security Act), properly served upon the department.

The child support services agency may order the department to deduct and withhold the allowance paid for a dependent minor child under AS

23.20.350(f)

, if the child support services agency finds that the individual claiming the allowance has a support obligation to the child and the child is not in the physical custody of the individual and is dependent on the individual for more than 50 percent of support.

The department shall pay an amount deducted and withheld under (b) and (c) of this section to the child support services agency of the Department of Revenue.

An amount deducted and withheld under (b) and (c) of this section shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by that individual to the child support services agency of the Department of Revenue in satisfaction of the individual’s child support obligations.

In (a) — (e) of this section, “unemployment compensation” means compensation payable under this chapter, including amounts payable under an agreement under a federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.

This section applies only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the child support services agency of the Department of Revenue for the administrative costs incurred by the department under this section.

In this section, “child support obligations” includes only obligations that are being enforced under a plan described in 42 U.S.C. 654 (§ 454, Social Security Act), which has been approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 651-665 (Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act).

History.

(§ 18 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1988; am § 36 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b)(2), substituted “42 U.S.C. 654(19)(B)(i) (sec. 454(19)(B)(i), Social Security Act)” for “section 42 U.S.C. 654(20)(B)(i) (sec. 454 (20)(B)(i), Social Security Act)”.

Sec. 23.20.403.
Voluntary income tax withholding.

When an individual files a new claim for unemployment compensation, the department shall advise the individual that

unemployment compensation benefits are subject to federal income tax;

federal requirements exist pertaining to estimated federal tax payments;

the individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from the individual’s payment of unemployment compensation benefits at the amount specified in 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code); and

the individual is permitted to change a previously elected status for the withholding of federal income tax.

Amounts deducted for federal income taxes and withheld from unemployment compensation benefits shall remain in the unemployment fund until transferred to the federal Internal Revenue Service as payment of federal income tax.

The department shall comply with legal requirements of the federal Department of Labor and the Internal Revenue Service regarding the deduction and withholding of federal income tax.

History.

(§ 16 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Sec. 23.20.405.
Assignment void; exemption of benefits.

An assignment, pledge, or encumbrance of a right to benefits which are or may become due or payable under this chapter is void.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 62 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 14 ch 62 SLA 1982.]

A waiver of an exemption provided in this section is void.

Benefits paid or payable under this chapter are exempt from levy to enforce the collection of a debt as provided in AS 09.38 (exemptions).

History.

(§ 763 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 4 ch 62 SLA 1982)